West Virginia, session 2026, HB5321.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 20. EDUCATION OF EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN. §18-20-13. Guaranteeing timely educational evaluations and continuity of services for children entering foster care or transition homes. For purposes of providing Individualized Education Program ("IEP") or 504 services, the initial evaluation period for children entering foster care or transition homes shall be limited to a maximum of 30 days. Further, upon the transfer of a student who is in the foster care system or transition home, the school from which the student transferred from shall provide the school for which the student transferred to with a copy of any current IEP or 504 PLAN for the student immediately upon transfer. The school shall then hold an IEP meeting or Student Assistance Team (“SAT”) within five days of receiving the IEP or 504 PLAN. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home